Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2703
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Civic and Community Center Financing Act:

(1) Applicant means and includes (a) any city or village in this state that is eligible for a grant of assistance pursuant to section 13-2706 and (b) any tribal government;

(2) Civic center means a facility that is used to host conventions, meetings, and cultural events or a library;

(3) Department means the Department of Economic Development;

(4) Eligible facility means any civic center, historic building or district, public space, or recreation center;

(5) Fund means the Civic and Community Center Financing Fund;

(6) Historic building or district means a property or district that is determined by the State Historic Preservation Officer or his or her designee to be eligible for listing on or currently listed on the National Register of Historic Places or a property that is certified as an individual property or district designated pursuant to a landmark ordinance or resolution enacted by a city, village, or county, which ordinance or resolution has been approved by the State Historic Preservation Officer;

(7) Political subdivision means a county, school district, community college area, or natural resources district;

(8) Public space means property located within the traditional center of a community, typically comprised of a cohesive core of residential, civic, religious, and commercial buildings, arranged around a main street and intersecting streets;

(9) Recreation center means a facility or park used for athletics, fitness, sport activities, or recreation that is owned by an applicant and is available for use by the general public with or without charge. Recreation center does not include any facility that requires a person to purchase a membership to utilize such facility; and

(10) Tribal government means the officially recognized government of any Indian tribe, nation, or other organized group or community located in the state exercising self-government powers and recognized as eligible for services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians or any Indian tribe located in the state and recognized as an Indian tribe by the state.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 15;

Laws 2011, LB297, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB153, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB940, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB564, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB883, § 1.
July 18, 2026